Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1117
Utility services; fire and police protection.

During the time any tract is designated as an industrial area, as provided by sections 13-1111 to 13-1120, the owners of such designated area shall provide at their expense for water, electricity, sewer, and fire and police protection.

Laws 1957, c. 51, § 7, p. 242;

Laws 1979, LB 217, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-2507.

During time a tract is designated as an industrial area, owners of property provide at their own expense for water, electricity, sewer, and fire protection. City of Grand Island v. Ehlers, 180 Neb. 331, 142 N.W.2d 770 (1966).